Utah statutes.
70A-9a-526.   Filing-office rules.

(1)  The Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall adopt and publish rules to implement this chapter that apply to a filing office described in Subsection 70A-9a-501(1)(b).  The filing-office rules must be:

(a)  consistent with this chapter; and

(b)  adopted and published in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(2)  To keep the filing-office rules and practices of the filing office in harmony with the rules and practices of filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part, and to keep the technology used by the filing office compatible with the technology used by filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part, the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code, so far as is consistent with the purposes, policies, and provisions of this chapter, in adopting, amending, and repealing filing-office rules, shall:

(a)  consult with filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part;

(b)  consult the most recent version of the Model Rules promulgated by the International Association of Corporate Administrators or any successor organization; and

(c)  take into consideration the rules and practices of, and the technology used by, filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

